Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2139
Additional grounds for disciplinary action.

In addition to the grounds for disciplinary action found in sections 38-178 and 38-179, a credential or privilege to practice or multistate authorization in Nebraska subject to the Mental Health Practice Act may be denied, refused renewal, limited, revoked, or suspended or have other disciplinary measures taken against it in accordance with section 38-196 when the applicant, licensee, or privilege holder fails to disclose the information required by section 38-2123, 38-2129, or 38-2142, the Licensed Professional Counselors Interstate Compact, or the Social Worker Licensure Compact.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 756;

Laws 2022, LB752, § 21;

Laws 2024, LB605, § 23;

Laws 2024, LB932, § 8.

Licensed Professional Counselors Interstate Compact, see section 38-4201.

Social Worker Licensure Compact, see section 38-4501.